Maine, session 132, LD919.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6001-D is enacted to read:
§6001-D. Surveys and questionnaires; parental permission
A public school, public charter school or private school approved for tuition purposes
may not administer to a student who is a minor a survey or questionnaire that asks or
identifies the student's full name without affirmative written permission from the student's
parent.